apertium-mar-eng.mar.dix
    <pardef n="घर__n_nt"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ासमोरच्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>समोर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="बाग__n_f">  
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेने</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांनी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांमधून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="मुल/गा__n_m">
      <e><p><l>गा</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाहून</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ामधे</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>े</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांहून</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांमधे</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
         
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="मुल/गी__n_f">
      <e><p><l>गी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहून</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीमधे</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींहून</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधे</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="बहीण__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>         
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आ/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ईला</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ईला</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ईहून</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ईमधे</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>या</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यांना</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यांना</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यांहून</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यांमधे</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="खिडक/ी__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीमधे</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांमधून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांमधे</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="हात__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बाग"><i>बाग</i><par n="बाग__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="मुलगा"><i>मुल</i><par n="मुल/गा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुलगी"><i>मुल</i><par n="मुल/गी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहीण"><i>बहीण</i><par n="बहीण__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आई"><i>आ</i><par n="आ/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खिडकी"><i>खिडक</i><par n="खिडक/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="झाड"><i>झाड</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="हात"><i>हात</i><par n="हात__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खेळ"><i>खेळ</i><par n="हात__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तर"><i>उत्तर</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रश्न"><i>प्रश्न</i><par n="हात__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वातावरण"><i>वातावरण</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="मुल"><i>मुल</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
